Massachusetts, session 194th, H2840.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 94 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after the word “department”, in line 17, the following words:- ,
911 emergency telecommunicators.
of 1